Maryland, session 2026, SB0881.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Financial Institutions Commercial Law
SUBTITLE 13. 16. COMMERCIAL FINANCING – CREDIT PROVISIONS.
12–1301. 12–1601.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “CLOSED–END FINANCING” MEANS A CLOSED–END EXTENSION OF
CREDIT, SECURED OR UNSECURED, INCLUDING EQUIPMENT FINANCING, THAT:
(I) DOES NOT MEET THE DEFINITION OF A LEASE UNDER
ARTICLE 2A OF THE UNIFORM COMMERCIAL CODE; AND
(II) THE PROCEEDS OF WHICH A RECIPIENT DOES NOT INTEND
TO USE PRIMARILY FOR PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD PURPOSES.
(2) “CLOSED–END FINANCING” INCLUDES FINANCING THAT HAS AN
ESTABLISHED PRINCIPAL AMOUNT AND DURATION.
(C) “COMMERCIAL FINANCING” MEANS OPEN–END FINANCING,
CLOSED–END FINANCING, SALES–BASED FINANCING, A FACTORING TRANSACTION,
OR ANOTHER FORM OF FINANCING, THE PROCEEDS OF WHICH THE RECIPIENT DOES
NOT INTEND TO USE PRIMARILY FOR PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD
PURPOSES.
(D) “COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION” MEANS A TRANSACTION IN
WHICH A PROVIDER EXTENDS COMMERCIAL FINANCING TO A RECIPIENT.

SENATE BILL 881 3
(E) “COMMISSIONER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–101 OF THE
FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE.
(D) (F) “FACTORING TRANSACTION” MEANS AN ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE
PURCHASE TRANSACTION:
(1) THAT INCLUDES AN AGREEMENT TO PURCHASE, TRANSFER, OR
SELL A LEGALLY ENFORCEABLE CLAIM FOR PAYMENT HELD BY A RECIPIENT FOR
GOODS THE RECIPIENT HAS SUPPLIED OR SERVICES THE RECIPIENT HAS RENDERED
THAT HAVE BEEN ORDERED BUT FOR WHICH PAYMENT HAS NOT BEEN MADE; AND
(2) THE PROCEEDS OF WHICH THE RECIPIENT DOES NOT INTEND TO
USE PRIMARILY FOR PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD PURPOSES.
(E) (G) (1) “FINANCE CHARGE” MEANS THE COST OF COMMERCIAL
FINANCING REPRESENTED AS A DOLLAR AMOUNT.
(2) “FINANCE CHARGE” INCLUDES:
(I) A CHARGE PAYABLE DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY BY A
RECIPIENT AND IMPOSED DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY BY A PROVIDER AS AN
INCIDENT TO OR A CONDITION OF THE EXTENSION OF COMMERCIAL FINANCING;
(II) A CHARGE THAT WOULD BE INCLUDED UNDER 12 C.F.R. §
1026.4 IF A TRANSACTION WERE SUBJECT TO 12 C.F.R. § 1026.4; AND
(III) ANY ADDITIONAL CHARGES DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSIONER BY REGULATION.
(F) (H) (1) “OPEN–END FINANCING” MEANS AN AGREEMENT FOR ONE
OR MORE EXTENSIONS OF SECURED OR UNSECURED OPEN–END CREDIT, THE
PROCEEDS OF WHICH A RECIPIENT DOES NOT INTEND TO USE PRIMARILY FOR
PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD PURPOSES.
(2) “OPEN–END FINANCING” INCLUDES CREDIT EXTENDED BY A
PROVIDER UNDER A PLAN IN WHICH:
(I) THE PROVIDER REASONABLY CONTEMPLATES REPEATED
TRANSACTIONS;
(II) THE PROVIDER MAY IMPOSE A FINANCE CHARGE ON AN
OUTSTANDING UNPAID BALANCE; AND

SENATE BILL 881
(III) THE AMOUNT OF CREDIT THAT MAY BE EXTENDED TO A
RECIPIENT DURING THE TERM OF THE PLAN, UP TO A LIMIT THAT THE PROVIDER
SETS, IS GENERALLY MADE AVAILABLE TO THE EXTENT THAT ANY OUTSTANDING
BALANCE IS REPAID.
(I) “PERSON” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–101 OF THE FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE.
(G) (J) (1) “PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON THAT, EITHER DIRECTLY OR
THROUGH A THIRD PARTY, EXTENDS A SPECIFIC OFFER OF COMMERCIAL FINANCING
TO A RECIPIENT.
(2) “PROVIDER” INCLUDES A PERSON THAT SOLICITS AND PRESENTS
A SPECIFIC OFFER OF COMMERCIAL FINANCING ON BEHALF OF A THIRD PARTY.
(H) (K) (1) “RECIPIENT” MEANS A PERSON, OR THE PERSON’S
AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE, THAT APPLIES FOR COMMERCIAL FINANCING AND
IS MADE A SPECIFIC OFFER OF COMMERCIAL FINANCING BY A PROVIDER.
(2) “RECIPIENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PERSON ACTING AS A
BROKER.
(I) (L) (1) “SALES–BASED FINANCING” MEANS A TRANSACTION:
(I) THAT IS REPAID BY A RECIPIENT TO A PROVIDER OVER TIME
AS A PERCENTAGE OF SALES OR REVENUE, IN WHICH THE PAYMENT AMOUNT MAY
INCREASE OR DECREASE ACCORDING TO THE VOLUME OF SALES MADE OR REVENUE
RECEIVED BY THE RECIPIENT; AND
(II) THE PROCEEDS OF WHICH THE RECIPIENT DOES NOT
INTEND TO USE PRIMARILY FOR PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD PURPOSES.
(2) “SALES–BASED FINANCING” INCLUDES A TRANSACTION
CONTAINING A TRUE–UP MECHANISM UNDER WHICH THE FINANCING IS REPAID AS
A FIXED PAYMENT BUT PROVIDES FOR A RECONCILIATION PROCESS THAT ADJUSTS
THE PAYMENT TO AN AMOUNT THAT IS A PERCENTAGE OF SALES OR REVENUE.
(J) (M) “SPECIFIC OFFER” MEANS THE TERMS OF COMMERCIAL
FINANCING THAT ARE QUOTED TO A RECIPIENT, BASED ON INFORMATION OBTAINED
FROM OR ABOUT THE RECIPIENT, THAT, IF ACCEPTED BY THE RECIPIENT, ARE
BINDING ON A PROVIDER, AS APPLICABLE, SUBJECT TO REQUIREMENTS STATED IN
THE TERMS OF THE COMMERCIAL FINANCING.
12–1302. 12–1602.

SENATE BILL 881 5
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) (I) A FEDERAL OR STATE BANK, CREDIT UNION, OR SAVINGS
ASSOCIATION INCORPORATED OR CHARTERED UNDER THE LAWS OF ANY STATE OR
THE UNITED STATES; OR
(II) A SUBSIDIARY OR AFFILIATE OF AN ORGANIZATION LISTED
IN ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM;
(2) A PERSON ACTING AS A TECHNOLOGY SERVICES PROVIDER TO AN
ENTITY EXEMPT UNDER THIS SECTION FOR USE AS PART OF THE ENTITY’S
COMMERCIAL FINANCING PROGRAM IF THE PERSON DOES NOT HAVE AN INTEREST,
ARRANGEMENT, OR AGREEMENT TO PURCHASE ANY INTEREST IN THE COMMERCIAL
FINANCING EXTENDED BY THE ENTITY IN CONNECTION WITH THE COMMERCIAL
FINANCING PROGRAM;
(3) A LENDER REGULATED UNDER THE FEDERAL FARM CREDIT ACT;
(4) A COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION SECURED BY REAL
PROPERTY;
(5) A LEASE AS DEFINED IN ARTICLE 2A OF THE UNIFORM
COMMERCIAL CODE;
(6) A PROVIDER OR OTHER PERSON WHO MAKES NOT MORE THAN
FIVE COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTIONS IN THE STATE IN A 12–MONTH
PERIOD;
(7) A COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION OF MORE THAN
$2,500,000;
(8) A COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION:
(I) IN WHICH THE RECIPIENT IS:
1. A DEALER, OR AN AFFILIATE OF A DEALER, AS
DEFINED IN § 11–111 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; OR
2. A RENTAL VEHICLE COMPANY, OR AN AFFILIATE OF A
RENTAL VEHICLE COMPANY, AS DEFINED IN § 18–108 OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE; AND

SENATE BILL 881
(II) MADE UNDER A COMMERCIAL FINANCING AGREEMENT OR
COMMERCIAL OPEN–END CREDIT PLAN OF AT LEAST $50,000, INCLUDING A
COMMERCIAL LOAN MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE COMMERCIAL FINANCING
TRANSACTION;
(9) A COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION THAT IS A FACTORING
TRANSACTION, AN ADVANCE, OR A SIMILAR TRANSACTION OF ACCOUNTS
RECEIVABLE OWED TO A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER BECAUSE OF A PATIENT’S
PERSONAL INJURY TREATED BY THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER; OR
(10) A PREMIUM FINANCE AGREEMENT, AS DEFINED IN § 23–101 OF
THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
12–1303. 12–1603.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 12–1307 § 12–1607 OF THIS SUBTITLE, FOR
PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE, AN ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE SHALL BE:
(1) EXPRESSED AS A YEARLY RATE, INCLUDING ALL FEES AND
FINANCE CHARGES; AND
(2) CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FEDERAL TRUTH IN
LENDING ACT.
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS
SECTION, AN ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE SHALL BE CALCULATED BASED ON THE
ESTIMATED TERM OF REPAYMENT AND THE PROJECTED PERIODIC PAYMENT
AMOUNTS OF A COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER
FEDERAL LAW OR REGULATION WOULD REQUIRE AN ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE TO
BE CALCULATED FOR A CERTAIN TRANSACTION.
(C) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO IMPOSE ANY LIABILITY ON A
PROVIDER THAT CHARGES AN ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE THAT DIFFERS FROM THE
ESTIMATED ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE DISCLOSED BY THE PROVIDER IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE OR ANY REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
12–1304. 12–1604.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT” MEANS THE
DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT OF A SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION PLUS THE
FINANCE CHARGE.

SENATE BILL 881 7
(B) (1) A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO
A RECIPIENT WHEN EXTENDING A SPECIFIC OFFER OF SALES–BASED FINANCING:
(I) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE SALES–BASED FINANCING AND
THE DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT, IF DIFFERENT FROM THE FINANCING AMOUNT,
MINUS ANY FEES DEDUCTED OR WITHHELD AT DISBURSEMENT;
(II) THE FINANCE CHARGE;
(III) THE ESTIMATED ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF THE
SALES–BASED FINANCING, USING THE WORDS “ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE” OR THE
ABBREVIATION “APR”;
(IV) THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT;
(V) THE ESTIMATED TERM OF REPAYMENT, AS DEFINED IN §
12–1305 12–1605 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(VI) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PROJECTED PERIODIC PAYMENT AMOUNTS;
(VII) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY OTHER POTENTIAL FEES AND
CHARGES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE CHARGE, INCLUDING DRAW FEES, LATE
PAYMENT FEES, AND RETURNED PAYMENT FEES; AND
(VIII) IF APPLICABLE, A DESCRIPTION OF COLLATERAL
REQUIREMENTS OR SECURITY INTERESTS.
(2) (I) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE FIXED, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY; AND
2. IF THE PAYMENT FREQUENCY IS OTHER THAN
MONTHLY, THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED PAYMENTS PER MONTH.
(II) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE VARIABLE, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT SCHEDULE OR A DESCRIPTION OF THE
METHOD USED TO CALCULATE THE AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY OF PAYMENTS; AND
2. THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED
PAYMENTS PER MONTH.

SENATE BILL 881
(C) (1) IF A RECIPIENT PAYS OFF OR REFINANCES THE SALES–BASED
FINANCING BEFORE THE END OF THE SCHEDULED REPAYMENT PERIOD, A
PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE WHETHER THE RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO
PAY:
(I) ANY FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST
ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S LAST PAYMENT; AND
(II) ANY ADDITIONAL FEES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE
CHARGE.
(2) IF A RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY ADDITIONAL
FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S
LAST PAYMENT, A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE PERCENTAGE OF ANY UNPAID
PORTION OF THE FINANCE CHARGE AND THE MAXIMUM DOLLAR AMOUNT THE
RECIPIENT COULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY.
12–1305. 12–1605.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ESTIMATED TERM OF REPAYMENT” MEANS THE
AMOUNT OF TIME REQUIRED FOR THE PERIODIC PAYMENTS MADE BY A RECIPIENT
IN A SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION TO EQUAL THE TOTAL AMOUNT
REQUIRED TO BE REPAID.
(B) (1) A PROVIDER SHALL USE THE PROJECTED SALES VOLUME OF A
RECIPIENT TO CALCULATE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION RELATED TO A
SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION:
(I) THE ESTIMATED TERM OF REPAYMENT AND THE
PROJECTED PAYMENT AMOUNTS OF A SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION; AND
(II) THE ESTIMATED ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF A
SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION.
(2) THE ESTIMATED ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF A SALES–BASED
FINANCING TRANSACTION SHALL BE CALCULATED:
(I) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FEDERAL TRUTH IN LENDING
ACT AND REGULATION Z, 12 C.F.R. § 1026.22; AND
(II) BASED ON THE ESTIMATED TERM OF REPAYMENT AND
PROJECTED SALES VOLUME OF A RECIPIENT.

SENATE BILL 881 9
(C) (1) A PROVIDER MAY CALCULATE THE PROJECTED SALES VOLUME OF
A RECIPIENT USING EITHER THE HISTORICAL METHOD OR THE OPT–IN METHOD.
(2) (I) A PROVIDER THAT USES THE HISTORICAL METHOD TO
CALCULATE THE PROJECTED SALES VOLUME OF A RECIPIENT SHALL USE AN
AVERAGE HISTORICAL VOLUME OF SALES OR REVENUE.
(II) A PROVIDER SHALL FIX THE HISTORICAL TIME PERIOD
USED TO CALCULATE THE AVERAGE HISTORICAL VOLUME AND USE THE SAME TIME
PERIOD FOR ALL DISCLOSURE PURPOSES FOR ANY SALES–BASED FINANCING
TRANSACTION PRODUCTS OFFERED.
(III) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (IV) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE FIXED HISTORICAL TIME PERIOD:
1. MAY NOT BE LESS THAN 1 MONTH AND MAY NOT
EXCEED 12 MONTHS; AND
2. SHALL BE THE TIME PERIOD DIRECTLY BEFORE THE
SPECIFIC OFFER WAS MADE.
(IV) A PROVIDER MAY CHOOSE TO USE THE AVERAGE SALES FOR
THE SAME NUMBER OF MONTHS AS THE PROVIDER WOULD HAVE USED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH WITH THE HIGHEST SALES VOLUME
WITHIN THE PAST 12 MONTHS.
(3) A PROVIDER MAY USE THE OPT–IN METHOD TO DETERMINE THE
INFORMATION LISTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION BY USING A
PROJECTED SALES VOLUME THAT THE PROVIDER CHOOSES FOR EACH DISCLOSURE
IF THE RECIPIENT PARTICIPATES IN A REVIEW PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE
COMMISSIONER.
(D) A PROVIDER SHALL NOTIFY THE COMMISSIONER OF WHICH OF THE TWO
METHODS THE PROVIDER INTENDS TO USE WHEN CALCULATING THE ESTIMATED
ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF EACH SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION.
(E) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, 2028, AND EACH
JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER, A PROVIDER THAT ELECTS TO USE THE OPT–IN METHOD
UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(3) OF THIS SECTION SHALL REPORT TO THE
COMMISSIONER ON:
(I) THE ESTIMATED ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATES GIVEN TO
EACH RECIPIENT; AND

SENATE BILL 881
(II) THE ACTUAL ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATES OF EACH
COMPLETED SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION.
(2) (I) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL CONTAIN ANY INFORMATION THE COMMISSIONER CONSIDERS
NECESSARY TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE DEVIATION BETWEEN THE ESTIMATED
ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATES AND ACTUAL ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATES OF
COMPLETED SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTIONS IS REASONABLE.
(II) THE COMMISSIONER MAY CONSIDER EXTRAORDINARY
CIRCUMSTANCES WHEN DETERMINING WHETHER THE PROVIDER’S DEVIATION
BETWEEN THE ESTIMATED ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE AND ACTUAL ANNUAL
PERCENTAGE RATE OF A SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION IS REASONABLE.
(III) IF THE COMMISSIONER FINDS THAT THERE WAS AN
UNREASONABLE DEVIATION BETWEEN ESTIMATED AND ACTUAL ANNUAL
PERCENTAGE RATES OF SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTIONS, THE
COMMISSIONER MAY REQUIRE THE PROVIDER TO USE THE HISTORICAL METHOD
INSTEAD OF THE OPT–IN METHOD IN DETERMINING THE PROJECTED SALES VOLUME
OF THE RECIPIENT.
12–1306. 12–1606.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT” MEANS THE
DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT OF A CLOSED–END FINANCING TRANSACTION PLUS THE
FINANCE CHARGE.
(B) (1) A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO
A RECIPIENT WHEN EXTENDING A SPECIFIC OFFER FOR CLOSED–END FINANCING:
(I) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE CLOSED–END FINANCING AND
THE DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT, IF DIFFERENT FROM THE FINANCING AMOUNT,
MINUS ANY FEES DEDUCTED OR WITHHELD AT DISBURSEMENT;
(II) THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT;
(III) THE FINANCE CHARGE;
(IV) THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF THE CLOSED–END
FINANCING, USING THE WORDS “ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE” OR THE
ABBREVIATION “APR”;
(V) THE TERM OF THE FINANCING;

SENATE BILL 881 11
(VI) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PROJECTED PERIODIC PAYMENT AMOUNTS;
(VII) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY OTHER POTENTIAL FEES AND
CHARGES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE CHARGE, INCLUDING DRAW FEES, LATE
PAYMENT FEES, AND RETURNED PAYMENT FEES; AND
(VIII) IF APPLICABLE, A DESCRIPTION OF COLLATERAL
REQUIREMENTS OR SECURITY INTERESTS.
(2) (I) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE FIXED, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY; AND
2. IF THE PAYMENT FREQUENCY IS OTHER THAN
MONTHLY, THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED PAYMENTS PER MONTH.
(II) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE VARIABLE, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT SCHEDULE OR A DESCRIPTION OF THE
METHOD USED TO CALCULATE THE AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY OF PAYMENTS; AND
2. THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED
PAYMENTS PER MONTH.
(3) THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE REQUIRED TO BE DISCLOSED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE:
(I) EXPRESSED AS A YEARLY RATE, INCLUSIVE OF ANY FEES
AND FINANCE CHARGES THAT CANNOT BE AVOIDED BY A RECIPIENT; AND
(II) CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FEDERAL TRUTH
IN LENDING ACT AND REGULATION Z, 12 C.F.R. § 1026.22, REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER FEDERAL LAW OR REGULATION WOULD REQUIRE THE CALCULATION.
(C) (1) IF A RECIPIENT PAYS OFF OR REFINANCES THE CLOSED–END
FINANCING BEFORE THE END OF THE SCHEDULED REPAYMENT PERIOD, A
PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE WHETHER THE RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO
PAY:
(I) ANY FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST
ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S LAST PAYMENT; AND

SENATE BILL 881
(II) ANY ADDITIONAL FEES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE
CHARGE.
(2) IF A RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY ADDITIONAL
FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S
LAST PAYMENT, A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE PERCENTAGE OF ANY UNPAID
PORTION OF THE FINANCE CHARGE AND MAXIMUM DOLLAR AMOUNT THE
RECIPIENT COULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY.
12–1307. 12–1607.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT” MEANS THE DRAW
AMOUNT OF THE OPEN–END FINANCING TRANSACTION, MINUS ANY FEES DEDUCTED
OR WITHHELD AT DISBURSEMENT, PLUS THE FINANCE CHARGE.
(B) (1) WHEN CALCULATING THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION, A PROVIDER SHALL ASSUME A DRAW AMOUNT
EQUAL TO THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT OF CREDIT AVAILABLE TO THE RECIPIENT IF
DRAWN AND HELD FOR THE DURATION OF THE TERM OR DRAW PERIOD.
(2) WHEN CALCULATING A FINANCE CHARGE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION, A PROVIDER SHALL ASSUME THAT THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT OF CREDIT
AVAILABLE TO THE RECIPIENT, IN EACH CASE, IS DRAWN AND HELD FOR THE
DURATION OF THE TERM OF THE DRAW PERIOD.
(C) (1) A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO
A RECIPIENT WHEN EXTENDING A SPECIFIC OFFER FOR OPEN–END FINANCING:
(I) THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT OF CREDIT AVAILABLE TO THE
RECIPIENT AND THE AMOUNT SCHEDULED TO BE DRAWN BY THE RECIPIENT AT THE
TIME THE OFFER IS EXTENDED, IF ANY, MINUS ANY FEES DEDUCTED OR WITHHELD
AT DISBURSEMENT;
(II) THE FINANCE CHARGE;
(III) THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT;
(IV) THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF THE COMMERCIAL
FINANCING, USING THE WORDS “ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE” OR THE
ABBREVIATION “APR”;
(V) THE TERM OF THE PLAN, IF APPLICABLE, OR THE PERIOD
OVER WHICH A DRAW IS AMORTIZED;

SENATE BILL 881 13
(VI) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PAYMENT FREQUENCY AND AMOUNTS;
(VII) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY OTHER POTENTIAL FEES AND
CHARGES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE CHARGE, INCLUDING DRAW FEES, LATE
PAYMENT FEES, AND RETURNED PAYMENT FEES; AND
(VIII) IF APPLICABLE, A DESCRIPTION OF COLLATERAL
REQUIREMENTS OR SECURITY INTERESTS.
(2) (I) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE FIXED, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY; AND
2. IF THE PAYMENT FREQUENCY IS OTHER THAN
MONTHLY, THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED PAYMENTS PER MONTH.
(II) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE VARIABLE, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT SCHEDULE OR A DESCRIPTION OF THE
METHOD USED TO CALCULATE THE AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY OF PAYMENTS; AND
2. THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED
PAYMENTS PER MONTH.
(3) THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE REQUIRED TO BE DISCLOSED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE:
(I) EXPRESSED AS A NOMINAL YEARLY RATE, INCLUSIVE OF
ANY FEES AND FINANCE CHARGES THAT CANNOT BE AVOIDED BY A RECIPIENT;
(II) CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FEDERAL TRUTH
IN LENDING ACT AND REGULATION Z, 12 C.F.R. § 1026.22; AND
(III) BASED ON THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT OF CREDIT AVAILABLE
TO THE RECIPIENT AND THE TERM RESULTING FROM MAKING THE MINIMUM
REQUIRED PAYMENTS AS DISCLOSED, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER FEDERAL LAW OR
REGULATION WOULD REQUIRE THE CALCULATION.
(D) (1) IF A RECIPIENT PAYS OFF OR REFINANCES THE OPEN–END
FINANCING BEFORE THE END OF THE SCHEDULED REPAYMENT PERIOD, A

SENATE BILL 881
PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE WHETHER THE RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO
PAY:
(I) ANY FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST
ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S LAST PAYMENT; AND
(II) ANY ADDITIONAL FEES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE
CHARGE.
(2) IF A RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY ADDITIONAL
FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S
LAST PAYMENT, A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE PERCENTAGE OF ANY UNPAID
PORTION OF THE FINANCE CHARGE AND MAXIMUM DOLLAR AMOUNT THE
RECIPIENT COULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY.
12–1308. 12–1608.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FINANCE CHARGE” INCLUDES A DISCOUNT TAKEN ON THE FACE
VALUE OF THE ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE.
(3) “TOTAL PAYMENT AMOUNT” MEANS THE PURCHASE AMOUNT OF
THE FACTORING TRANSACTION PLUS THE FINANCE CHARGE.
(B) A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO A
RECIPIENT WHEN EXTENDING A SPECIFIC OFFER FOR A FACTORING TRANSACTION:
(1) THE AMOUNT OF THE RECEIVABLES PURCHASE PRICE PAID TO
THE RECIPIENT AND, IF DIFFERENT FROM THE PURCHASE PRICE, THE
DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT AFTER ANY FEES DEDUCTED OR WITHHELD AT
DISBURSEMENT;
(2) THE TOTAL PAYMENT AMOUNT;
(3) THE FINANCE CHARGE;
(4) THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF THE FACTORING
TRANSACTION, USING THE WORDS “ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE” OR THE
ABBREVIATION “APR”, CALCULATED ACCORDING TO THE FEDERAL TRUTH IN
LENDING ACT AND REGULATION Z, 12 C.F.R. § 1026, APPENDIX J, AS A “SINGLE
ADVANCE, SINGLE PAYMENT TRANSACTION”;

SENATE BILL 881 15
(5) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY OTHER POTENTIAL FEES AND CHARGES
THAT CAN BE AVOIDED BY THE RECIPIENT; AND
(6) A DESCRIPTION OF THE RECEIVABLES PURCHASED AND, IF
APPLICABLE, ANY ADDITIONAL COLLATERAL REQUIREMENTS OR SECURITY
INTERESTS.
(C) (1) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE
RATE SHALL BE CALCULATED ACCORDING TO THE FEDERAL TRUTH IN LENDING
ACT AND REGULATION Z, 12 C.F.R. § 1026, APPENDIX J, AS A “SINGLE ADVANCE,
SINGLE PAYMENT TRANSACTION”, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER FEDERAL LAW OR
REGULATION WOULD REQUIRE AN ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE TO BE CALCULATED
FOR A CERTAIN TRANSACTION.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
PROVIDER SHALL USE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO CALCULATE THE
ESTIMATED ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION:
1. THE PURCHASE AMOUNT IS THE FINANCING AMOUNT;
2. THE PAYMENT AMOUNT IS THE PURCHASE AMOUNT
MINUS THE FINANCE CHARGE; AND
3. THE TERM OF THE FACTORING TRANSACTION IS
DETERMINED BY THE PAYMENT DUE DATE OF THE RECEIVABLES.
(II) A PROVIDER MAY ESTIMATE THE TERM FOR A FACTORING
TRANSACTION AS THE AVERAGE PAYMENT PERIOD, USING HISTORICAL DATA OVER
A PERIOD NOT TO EXCEED THE PREVIOUS 12 MONTHS, CONCERNING PAYMENT
INVOICES PAID BY THE PARTY OWING THE ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE IN QUESTION.
12–1309. 12–1609.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT” MEANS THE
DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT OF A COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION PLUS THE
FINANCE CHARGE.
(B) A PROVIDER MAY EXTEND A SPECIFIC OFFER OF COMMERCIAL
FINANCING THAT IS NOT AN OPEN–END FINANCING, A CLOSED–END FINANCING, A
SALES–BASED FINANCING, OR A FACTORING TRANSACTION BUT OTHERWISE MEETS
THE DEFINITION OF COMMERCIAL FINANCING UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) IF A PROVIDER EXTENDS A SPECIFIC OFFER THAT IS NOT AN
OPEN–END FINANCING, A CLOSED–END FINANCING, A SALES–BASED FINANCING, OR

SENATE BILL 881
A FACTORING TRANSACTION BUT OTHERWISE MEETS THE DEFINITION OF
COMMERCIAL FINANCING UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE:
(I) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE COMMERCIAL FINANCING
INCLUDING THE DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT, IF DIFFERENT FROM THE FINANCING
AMOUNT, MINUS ANY FEES DEDUCTED OR WITHHELD AT DISBURSEMENT;
(II) THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT;
(III) THE FINANCE CHARGE;
(IV) THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF THE COMMERCIAL
FINANCING, USING THE WORDS “ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE” OR THE
ABBREVIATION “APR”, EXPRESSED AS A YEARLY RATE, INCLUSIVE OF ANY FEES
AND FINANCE CHARGES, AND CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RELEVANT
SECTIONS OF THE FEDERAL TRUTH IN LENDING ACT, REGULATION Z, 12 C.F.R. §
1026.22, OR THIS ARTICLE, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER FEDERAL LAW, THE
REGULATION, OR THIS ARTICLE WOULD REQUIRE THE CALCULATION;
(V) THE TERM OF THE COMMERCIAL FINANCING;
(VI) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PAYMENT FREQUENCY AND AMOUNTS;
(VII) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY OTHER POTENTIAL FEES AND
CHARGES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE CHARGE, INCLUDING LATE PAYMENT
FEES AND RETURNED PAYMENT FEES; AND
(VIII) IF APPLICABLE, A DESCRIPTION OF COLLATERAL
REQUIREMENTS OR SECURITY INTERESTS.
(2) (I) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE FIXED, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY; AND
2. IF THE PAYMENT FREQUENCY IS OTHER THAN
MONTHLY, THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED PAYMENTS PER MONTH.
(II) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE VARIABLE, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT SCHEDULE OR A DESCRIPTION OF THE
METHOD USED TO CALCULATE THE AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY OF PAYMENTS; AND

SENATE BILL 881 17
2. THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED
PAYMENTS PER MONTH.
(D) (1) IF A RECIPIENT PAYS OFF OR REFINANCES THE COMMERCIAL
FINANCING BEFORE THE END OF THE SCHEDULED REPAYMENT PERIOD, A
PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE WHETHER THE RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO
PAY:
(I) ANY FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST
ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S LAST PAYMENT; AND
(II) ANY ADDITIONAL FEES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE
CHARGE.
(2) IF A RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY ADDITIONAL
FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S
LAST PAYMENT, A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE PERCENTAGE OF ANY UNPAID
PORTION OF THE FINANCE CHARGE AND MAXIMUM DOLLAR AMOUNT THE
RECIPIENT COULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY.
12–1310. 12–1610.
(A) A PROVIDER MAY REQUIRE A RECIPIENT TO PAY OFF THE BALANCE OF
AN EXISTING COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION FROM THE SAME PROVIDER
AS A CONDITION OF OBTAINING A NEW OR RENEWAL COMMERCIAL FINANCING
TRANSACTION.
(B) IF A PROVIDER REQUIRES A RECIPIENT TO PAY OFF A COMMERCIAL
FINANCING TRANSACTION BEFORE OBTAINING A NEW OR RENEWAL COMMERCIAL
FINANCING TRANSACTION, THE PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE:
(1) THE AMOUNT OF THE NEW OR RENEWAL COMMERCIAL FINANCING
THAT WILL BE USED TO PAY OFF THE PORTION OF THE EXISTING COMMERCIAL
FINANCING THAT CONSISTS OF ANY REQUIRED PREPAYMENT CHARGES; AND
(2) ANY UNPAID INTEREST THAT WAS NOT FORGIVEN AT THE TIME
THE RECIPIENT ENTERED INTO THE NEW OR RENEWAL COMMERCIAL FINANCING.
(C) (1) FOR FINANCING FOR WHICH THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT IS
CALCULATED AS A FIXED AMOUNT, THE PREPAYMENT CHARGE IS EQUAL TO THE
ORIGINAL FINANCE CHARGE MULTIPLIED BY THE AMOUNT OF THE NEW OR
RENEWAL COMMERCIAL FINANCING USED TO PAY OFF THE EXISTING COMMERCIAL
FINANCING TRANSACTION AS A PERCENTAGE OF THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT,

SENATE BILL 881
MINUS ANY PORTION OF THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT FORGIVEN BY THE
PROVIDER AT THE TIME OF PREPAYMENT.
(2) IF THE PREPAYMENT CHARGE IS MORE THAN ZERO, THE
PROVIDER SHALL RECORD THE AMOUNT AS THE ANSWER TO THE FOLLOWING
QUESTION:
“DOES THE NEW OR RENEWAL COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION INCLUDE
ANY AMOUNT THAT IS USED TO PAY UNPAID FINANCE CHARGES OR FEES, ALSO
KNOWN AS DOUBLE DIPPING? YES, (ENTER AMOUNT)”.
(D) IF THE DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT OF THE NEW OR RENEWAL
COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION WILL BE REDUCED TO PAY DOWN ANY
UNPAID PORTION OF THE OUTSTANDING BALANCE OF THE EXISTING COMMERCIAL
FINANCING, THE PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE ACTUAL DOLLAR AMOUNT BY
WHICH THE DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT WILL BE REDUCED.
12–1311. 12–1611.
A RECIPIENT SHALL SIGN, MANUALLY OR ELECTRONICALLY, EACH
APPLICABLE DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE BEFORE A PROVIDER
MAY ALLOW THE RECIPIENT TO PROCEED WITH THE COMMERCIAL FINANCING
APPLICATION.
12–1312. 12–1612.
(A) (1) NOTHING IN THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CONSTRUED TO PREVENT A
PROVIDER FROM DISCLOSING ADDITIONAL INFORMATION TO A RECIPIENT
REGARDING A COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION.
(2) IF A PROVIDER PROVIDES AN ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURE TO A
RECIPIENT OTHER THAN WHAT IS REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE, THE ADDITIONAL
DISCLOSURE IS NOT CONSIDERED A REQUIRED DISCLOSURE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) IF ADDITIONAL METRICS OF FINANCING COSTS ARE DISCLOSED
OR USED IN THE APPLICATION PROCESS FOR COMMERCIAL FINANCING, THE
ADDITIONAL METRICS MAY NOT BE PRESENTED AS A RATE IF THEY ARE NOT THE
ANNUAL INTEREST RATE OR THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE.
(2) THE TERM “INTEREST”, WHEN USED TO DESCRIBE A PERCENTAGE
RATE, MAY BE USED ONLY TO DESCRIBE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATES, INCLUDING
THE ANNUAL INTEREST RATE.

SENATE BILL 881 19
(C) IF A PROVIDER STATES A RATE OF FINANCE CHARGE OR A FINANCING
AMOUNT TO A RECIPIENT DURING THE APPLICATION PROCESS FOR COMMERCIAL
FINANCING, THE PROVIDER SHALL ALSO STATE THE RATE AS AN “ANNUAL
PERCENTAGE RATE”, USING THAT TERM OR THE ABBREVIATION “APR”.
12–1313. 12–1613.
(A) TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL MAY ADOPT
REGULATIONS SUBSTANTIALLY THE SAME AS REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE NEW
YORK STATE DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES REGARDING COMMERCIAL
FINANCING.
(B) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL MAY APPROVE THE USE OF COMMERCIAL
FINANCING DISCLOSURE FORMS APPROVED FOR USE IN OTHER STATES WITH
COMMERCIAL FINANCING DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENTS THAT ARE SUBSTANTIALLY
SIMILAR TO OR EXCEED THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
12–1314. 12–1614.
(A) (1) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY NOT
EXCEEDING:
(I) $2,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) $10,000 FOR EACH WILLFUL VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER MAY ORDER ADDITIONAL RELIEF,
INCLUDING RESTITUTION OR A PERMANENT OR PRELIMINARY INJUNCTION ON
BEHALF OF A RECIPIENT AFFECTED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) IF A COMPLAINT ABOUT A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS FILED WITH
THE COMMISSIONER, THE THE COMMISSIONER MAY INVESTIGATE THE COMPLAINT
AND USE ANY OF THE INVESTIGATIVE AND ENFORCEMENT POWERS PROVIDED
UNDER TITLE 2, SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS ARTICLE §§ 2–113 THROUGH 2–116 OF THE
FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE TO ENFORCE THIS SUBTITLE.
12–1615.
THE STATE’S ATTORNEY FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE VIOLATION OCCURS
OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY PROSECUTE ANY VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
12–1616.

SENATE BILL 881
ANY LICENSEE, AS DEFINED IN § 14–101 OF THE FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS
ARTICLE, THAT KNOWINGLY VIOLATES ANY PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS GUILTY
OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING
$500 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 6 MONTHS OR BOTH.
Article – Financial Institutions
2–120.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Board” means the State Collection Agency Licensing Board established
under Title 7 of the Business Regulation Article.
(3) “Fund” means the Non–Depository Special Fund established under this
section.
(4) “License” means any license issued by the Commissioner or the Board
under applicable law.
(5) “License category” refers to all licenses issued by either the
Commissioner or the Board under any of the following provisions:
(i) Title 11, Subtitle 2 of this article;
(ii) Title 11, Subtitle 3 of this article;
(iii) Title 11, Subtitle 4 of this article;
(iv) Title 11, Subtitle 5 of this article;
(v) Title 11, Subtitle 6 of this article;
(vi) Title 12, Subtitle 1 of this article;
(vii) Title 12, Subtitle 4 of this article;
(viii) Title 12, Subtitle 9 of this article; [or]
(IX) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
[(ix)] (X) Title 7 of the Business Regulation Article.
(6) “Licensed person” means any person required by law to be licensed by
either the Commissioner or the Board, regardless of whether the person maintains the
required license.

SENATE BILL 881 21
(7) “Registered person” means any person required by law to be registered
by the Commissioner or the Board, regardless of whether the person maintains the required
registration.
(8) “Regulated person” means:
(i) A licensed person or registered person; or
(ii) Any person otherwise engaging in activity subject to a provision
of law, regulation, rule, or order over which the Commissioner has jurisdiction, other than
activity subject to any of Titles 3 through 9 of this article.
(b) There is a Non–Depository Special Fund that consists of:
(1) All revenues received from licensing fees from each licensed person;
(2) All revenues received from registration fees from each registered
person;
(3) All revenues received from annual assessments under subsection (h) of
this section;
(4) Income from the investments that the State Treasurer makes for the
Fund; and
(5) Any other fee, examination or investigation fee or assessment, or
revenue received by the Commissioner or the Board with respect to any regulated person.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section:
(1) The Commissioner and the Board shall pay all fines and penalties
collected from any regulated person into the General Fund of the State; and
(2) Revenue received by the Commissioner for use of the Foreclosed
Property Registry established under Title 7 of the Real Property Article shall be paid by
the Commissioner to the Foreclosed Property Registry Fund established under § 7–105.14
of the Real Property Article.
(d) The purpose of the Fund is to cover the direct and indirect costs of fulfilling
the statutory and regulatory duties of the Commissioner and the Board related to regulated
persons.
(e) (1) The annual State budget shall include the costs and expenses of the
Commissioner and the Board relating to subsection (d) of this section.

SENATE BILL 881
(2) Any expenditures from the Fund to cover costs and expenses of the
Commissioner and the Board relating to subsection (d) of this section may be made only:
(i) With an appropriation from the Fund approved by the General
Assembly in the annual State budget; or
(ii) By the budget amendment procedure under § 7–209 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) If, in any fiscal year, the amount of the revenue collected by the
Commissioner and the Board and deposited into the Fund exceeds the actual appropriation
for the Commissioner and the Board under paragraph (2)(i) of this subsection, the excess
amount shall be carried forward within the Fund.
(f) (1) The State Treasurer is the custodian of the Fund.
(2) The State Treasurer shall deposit payments received from the
Commissioner and the Board into the Fund.
(g) (1) (i) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to §
7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(ii) The Fund may not be deemed a part of the General Fund of the
State.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by law, no part of the Fund may revert or be
credited to:
(i) The General Fund of the State; or
(ii) Any other special fund of the State.
(h) (1) In order to ensure the Fund contains sufficient amounts to achieve its
purpose under subsection (d) of this section, the Commissioner may impose an annual
assessment on any licensed person not more than once each year.
(2) In calculating an assessment with respect to any licensed person, the
Commissioner may consider:
(i) The costs incurred by the Commissioner or the Board in
supervising licensed persons of that license category;
(ii) The type of business conducted in the State by that licensed
person;
(iii) The volume of business that licensed person conducts in the
State;

SENATE BILL 881 23
(iv) Assets of the licensed person; and
(v) Any other factor the Commissioner considers appropriate.
(3) A licensed person shall pay any assessment imposed under this section
to the Commissioner within 30 calendar days after the assessment is imposed.
(4) THE REVOCATION, SUSPENSION, SURRENDER, OR OTHER
TERMINATION OF A LICENSE DOES NOT RELIEVE A PERSON OF THE OBLIGATION TO
PAY ANY ASSESSMENT IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION WHEN THE LICENSE WAS
VALID.
[(4)] (5) (i) Failure by a licensed person to timely pay an annual
assessment under this section is a violation of this section.
(ii) The Commissioner may take action for the violation against the
licensed person and the license under applicable law.
TITLE 14. COMMERCIAL FINANCING.
SUBTITLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS.
14–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMERCIAL FINANCING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–1601 OF
THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(C) “COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 12–1601 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(D) “CONTROL” MEANS:
(1) IF THE LICENSEE IS A CORPORATION:
(I) THE DIRECT OR INDIRECT OWNERSHIP OF AT LEAST 25% OF
THE VOTING SHARES OF THE LICENSEE; OR
(II) THE ABILITY TO ELECT A MAJORITY OF THE DIRECTORS OF
THE LICENSEE OR OTHERWISE EFFECT A CHANGE IN POLICY OF THE LICENSEE; OR

SENATE BILL 881
(2) IF THE LICENSEE IS NOT A CORPORATION, THE POSSESSION,
DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, OF THE POWER TO DIRECT OR CAUSE THE DIRECTION OF
THE MANAGEMENT AND POLICIES OF THE LICENSEE WHETHER THROUGH
OWNERSHIP, BY CONTRACT, OR OTHERWISE.
(E) (1) “CONTROL PERSON” MEANS A PERSON THAT HAS THE POWER,
DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, TO CONTROL A LICENSEE OR AN APPLICANT FOR A
LICENSE.
(2) “CONTROL PERSON” INCLUDES:
(I) A GENERAL PARTNER, AN OFFICER, A DIRECTOR, OR A
MEMBER OF A LICENSEE OR AN APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE OR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO
OCCUPIES A SIMILAR POSITION OR PERFORMS A SIMILAR FUNCTION;
(II) A PERSON THAT, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, HAS:
1. THE RIGHT TO VOTE AT LEAST 20% OF A CLASS OF
VOTING SECURITIES OF A LICENSEE OR AN APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE; OR
2. THE POWER TO SELL OR DIRECT THE SALE OF AT
LEAST 20% OF A CLASS OF VOTING SECURITIES OF A LICENSEE OR AN APPLICANT
FOR A LICENSE; AND
(III) IN THE CASE OF A PARTNERSHIP, A LIMITED PARTNERSHIP,
A LIMITED LIABILITY PARTNERSHIP, A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, OR ANY OTHER
BUSINESS ENTITY, A PERSON THAT:
1. ON LIQUIDATION OR DISSOLUTION OF A LICENSEE OR
AN APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE, HAS THE RIGHT TO RECEIVE AT LEAST 20% OF THE
CAPITAL OF THE LICENSEE OR APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE; OR
2. HAS CONTRIBUTED AT LEAST 20% OF THE CAPITAL
OF A LICENSEE OR AN APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE.
(F) “LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE ISSUED IN ANY FORM BY THE
COMMISSIONER UNDER THIS TITLE TO DO BUSINESS AS A PROVIDER, INCLUDING AS
PROVIDED THROUGH NMLS.
(G) “LICENSED LOCATION” MEANS ANY LOCATION LISTED BY THE LICENSEE
IN NMLS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE.
(H) “LICENSED NAME” MEANS:

SENATE BILL 881 25
(1) THE LICENSEE’S LEGAL NAME; AND
(2) ANY TRADE NAME USED BY THE LICENSEE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–121 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(I) “LICENSEE” MEANS A PERSON LICENSED BY THE COMMISSIONER
UNDER THIS TITLE TO DO BUSINESS AS A PROVIDER.
(J) “PROVIDER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–1601 OF THE
COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(K) “RECIPIENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–1601 OF THE
COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(L) “UNIQUE IDENTIFIER” MEANS A NUMBER OR ANOTHER IDENTIFIER
ASSIGNED BY NMLS.
14–102.
THE COMMISSIONER MAY USE THE INVESTIGATIVE AND ENFORCEMENT
POWERS PROVIDED UNDER §§ 2–113 THROUGH 2–116 OF THIS ARTICLE TO ENFORCE
THIS TITLE.
SUBTITLE 2. LICENSING PROVISIONS.
14–201.
(A) ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, A PERSON MAY NOT ENGAGE IN THE
BUSINESS OF COMMERCIAL FINANCING IF THE PERSON IS LOCATED IN THE STATE
UNLESS THE PERSON:
(1) IS LICENSED BY THE COMMISSIONER; OR
(2) IS EXEMPT FROM THE PROVISIONS OF TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 16 OF
THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(B) EACH LICENSEE OR APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE SHALL OBTAIN AND
MAINTAIN A VALID UNIQUE IDENTIFIER ISSUED BY NMLS ON FORMING AN ACCOUNT
WITH NMLS.
(C) AN APPLICANT FOR AN INITIAL LICENSE OR A LICENSE RENEWAL SHALL
APPLY FOR THE LICENSE OR RENEWAL THROUGH NMLS.
14–202.

SENATE BILL 881
TO QUALIFY FOR A LICENSE, AN APPLICANT SHALL SATISFY THE
COMMISSIONER THAT THE APPLICANT IS OF GOOD MORAL CHARACTER AND HAS
SUFFICIENT FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY, BUSINESS EXPERIENCE, AND GENERAL
FITNESS TO:
(1) ENGAGE IN THE BUSINESS OF COMMERCIAL FINANCING;
(2) WARRANT THE BELIEF THAT THE BUSINESS WILL BE CONDUCTED
LAWFULLY, HONESTLY, FAIRLY, AND EFFICIENTLY; AND
(3) COMMAND THE CONFIDENCE OF THE PUBLIC.
14–203.
(A) TO APPLY FOR A LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, AN APPLICANT SHALL:
(1) COMPLETE, SIGN, AND SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSIONER AN
APPLICATION MADE UNDER OATH IN THE FORM AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
PROCESS THAT THE COMMISSIONER REQUIRES; AND
(2) PROVIDE ALL INFORMATION THAT THE COMMISSIONER
REQUESTS.
(B) AN APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL PROVIDE:
(1) (I) THE APPLICANT’S LEGAL NAME AND ANY TRADE NAME USED
BY THE APPLICANT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–121 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(II) UNLESS THE APPLICANT IS AN INDIVIDUAL, THE NAME OF
EACH CONTROL PERSON; AND
(2) (I) THE ADDRESS OF THE PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF
THE APPLICANT;
(II) THE ADDRESS OF EACH ADDITIONAL LOCATION, IF ANY,
THAT:
1. THE GENERAL PUBLIC MAY REASONABLY VIEW AS A
LOCATION THAT ENGAGES IN THE BUSINESS OF COMMERCIAL FINANCING,
INCLUDING ANY LOCATION THAT INVESTIGATES RECIPIENT COMPLAINTS OR
DIRECTLY COMMUNICATES WITH RECIPIENTS ORALLY, ELECTRONICALLY, OR IN
WRITING;

SENATE BILL 881 27
2. HOUSES ANY CORE OPERATIONAL INFRASTRUCTURE
OF TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS;
3. CONDUCTS ANY CORE MANAGEMENT, INFORMATION
SECURITY AND TECHNOLOGY, RISK AND COMPLIANCE, OR FINANCE FUNCTIONS; OR
4. IS OTHERWISE REQUIRED TO BE LISTED IN NMLS BY
REGULATION ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSIONER;
(III) UNLESS THE APPLICANT IS AN INDIVIDUAL, THE ADDRESS
OF EACH CONTROL PERSON; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE COMMISSIONER
REASONABLY REQUIRES.
(C) WITH THE APPLICATION, THE APPLICANT SHALL PAY TO THE
COMMISSIONER A NONREFUNDABLE LICENSE FEE OF $850.
(D) IN ADDITION TO THE LICENSE FEE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)
OF THIS SECTION, AN APPLICANT FOR AN INITIAL LICENSE SHALL PAY TO NMLS
THE FEE THAT NMLS IMPOSES TO PROCESS THE APPLICATION.
14–204.
(A) (1) THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER ANY FEDERAL LAW AND TITLE 4,
SUBTITLES 1 THROUGH 5 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE REGARDING THE
PRIVACY OR CONFIDENTIALITY OF INFORMATION OR MATERIAL PROVIDED TO
NMLS AND ANY PRIVILEGE ARISING UNDER FEDERAL OR STATE LAW, INCLUDING
THE RULES OF ANY FEDERAL OR STATE COURT WITH RESPECT TO THE INFORMATION
OR MATERIAL, SHALL CONTINUE TO APPLY TO THE INFORMATION OR MATERIAL
AFTER THE INFORMATION OR MATERIAL HAS BEEN DISCLOSED TO NMLS.
(2) THE INFORMATION AND MATERIAL MAY BE SHARED WITH ALL
STATE AND FEDERAL REGULATORY OFFICIALS HAVING OVERSIGHT AUTHORITY
OVER THE COMMERCIAL FINANCING INDUSTRY, INCLUDING THE FINANCIAL
CRIMES ENFORCEMENT NETWORK, WITHOUT THE LOSS OF PRIVILEGE OR THE LOSS
OF CONFIDENTIALITY PROTECTIONS PROVIDED BY FEDERAL LAW OR TITLE 4,
SUBTITLES 1 THROUGH 5 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
(B) THE COMMISSIONER MAY ENTER INTO INFORMATION–SHARING
AGREEMENTS WITH OTHER GOVERNMENT AGENCIES, THE CONFERENCE OF STATE
BANK SUPERVISORS, AND OTHER ASSOCIATIONS REPRESENTING GOVERNMENT
AGENCIES, INCLUDING THE FINANCIAL CRIMES ENFORCEMENT NETWORK.

SENATE BILL 881
(C) INFORMATION OR MATERIAL THAT IS SUBJECT TO A PRIVILEGE OR
CONFIDENTIALITY UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE SUBJECT
TO:
(1) DISCLOSURE UNDER ANY FEDERAL OR STATE LAW GOVERNING
THE DISCLOSURE TO THE PUBLIC OF INFORMATION HELD BY AN OFFICER OR
AGENCY OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT OR A STATE THAT HAS RECEIVED THE
INFORMATION OR MATERIAL; OR
(2) SUBPOENA, DISCOVERY, OR ADMISSION INTO EVIDENCE IN ANY
PRIVATE CIVIL ACTION OR ADMINISTRATIVE PROCESS, UNLESS WITH RESPECT TO
ANY PRIVILEGE HELD BY NMLS THE PERSON TO WHOM THE INFORMATION OR
MATERIAL PERTAINS WAIVES, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, THE PRIVILEGE.
(D) ANY PROVISIONS OF TITLE 4, SUBTITLES 1 THROUGH 5 OF THE
GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE RELATING TO THE DISCLOSURE OF ANY
INFORMATION OR MATERIAL DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION THAT
ARE INCONSISTENT WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE SUPERSEDED
BY THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(E) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO INFORMATION OR MATERIAL
RELATING TO PUBLICLY ADJUDICATED DISCIPLINARY AND ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS
AGAINST A PROVIDER THAT IS INCLUDED IN NMLS AND DESIGNATED FOR ACCESS
BY THE PUBLIC.
14–205.
(A) AFTER THE FILING OF A COMPLETE APPLICATION, THE COMMISSIONER
SHALL INVESTIGATE THE FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY, BUSINESS EXPERIENCE,
CHARACTER, AND GENERAL FITNESS OF THE APPLICANT.
(B) (1) UNLESS THE COMMISSIONER NOTIFIES THE APPLICANT THAT A
DIFFERENT TIME PERIOD IS NECESSARY, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL APPROVE OR
DENY EACH APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE DATE A
COMPLETE APPLICATION IS FILED.
(2) THE APPLICANT MAY BY WRITTEN REQUEST TO THE
COMMISSIONER WITHDRAW THE APPLICATION AT ANY TIME BEFORE THE ISSUANCE
OF THE LICENSE.
(C) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ISSUE A LICENSE TO ANY APPLICANT WHO
MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 881 29
(D) (1) IF AN APPLICANT DOES NOT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL:
(I) NOTIFY THE APPLICANT IMMEDIATELY OF THIS FACT; AND
(II) SUBJECT TO THE HEARING PROVISIONS OF § 14–211 OF
THIS SUBTITLE, DENY THE APPLICATION.
(2) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE COMMISSIONER DENIES AN
APPLICATION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL STATE THE REASONS FOR THE DENIAL IN
WRITING AND MAIL THEM TO THE ADDRESS LISTED IN THE APPLICATION.
14–206.
(A) INFORMATION IN NMLS ASSOCIATED WITH A LICENSE APPROVED BY
THE COMMISSIONER UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING:
(1) THE LICENSEE’S LEGAL NAME AND ANY TRADE NAME USED BY
THE LICENSEE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–121 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) THE ADDRESS OF THE LICENSEE’S PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE
OFFICE; AND
(3) THE ADDRESS OF EACH ADDITIONAL LOCATION, IF ANY, WHERE
THE LICENSEE DOES BUSINESS AND THAT:
(I) THE GENERAL PUBLIC MAY REASONABLY VIEW AS A
LOCATION THAT OFFERS COMMERCIAL FINANCING, INCLUDING ANY LOCATION
THAT INVESTIGATES RECIPIENT COMPLAINTS OR DIRECTLY COMMUNICATES WITH
RECIPIENTS ORALLY, ELECTRONICALLY, OR IN WRITING;
(II) HOUSES ANY CORE OPERATIONAL INFRASTRUCTURE OR
TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS;
(III) CONDUCTS ANY CORE MANAGEMENT, INFORMATION
SECURITY AND TECHNOLOGY, RISK AND COMPLIANCE, OR FINANCE FUNCTIONS; OR
(IV) IS OTHERWISE REQUIRED TO BE LISTED IN NMLS BY
REGULATION ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSIONER.
(B) A LICENSEE SHALL MAINTAIN AND UPDATE THE INFORMATION IN
NMLS ASSOCIATED WITH THE LICENSEE’S LICENSE TO REFLECT ACCURATELY AT
ALL TIMES THE INFORMATION REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 881
(C) THE UNIQUE IDENTIFIER ASSIGNED BY NMLS TO A LICENSEE SHALL
CONSTITUTE THE LICENSEE’S LICENSE NUMBER.
(D) A LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSEE TO DO BUSINESS UNDER THE
LICENSE AT ANY LICENSED LOCATION AND UNDER ANY LICENSED NAME.
(E) A LICENSE MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED OR ASSIGNED.
(F) EACH LICENSEE SHALL CONSPICUOUSLY DISPLAY THE FOLLOWING
INFORMATION ON THE LICENSEE’S WEBSITE, ANY SOFTWARE APPLICATION
ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC AND USED TO PROVIDE COMMERCIAL FINANCING, AND
THE PROFILE PAGE WITHIN EACH SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM THE LICENSEE USES:
(1) THE LICENSEE’S UNIQUE IDENTIFIER; AND
(2) A LINK TO THE NMLS CONSUMER ACCESS WEBSITE.
14–207.
(A) SUBJECT TO ANY REGULATION ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSIONER, AN
INITIAL LICENSE TERM SHALL:
(1) BEGIN ON THE DAY THE LICENSE IS ISSUED; AND
(2) EXPIRE AT THE END OF DECEMBER 31 OF THE YEAR:
(I) THE LICENSE IS ISSUED, IF THE LICENSE IS ISSUED BEFORE
NOVEMBER 1; OR
(II) SUCCEEDING THE YEAR THAT THE LICENSE IS ISSUED, IF
THE LICENSE IS ISSUED ON OR AFTER NOVEMBER 1.
(B) ON OR AFTER NOVEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, A LICENSE MAY BE RENEWED
FOR A 1–YEAR TERM IF THE LICENSEE:
(1) OTHERWISE IS ENTITLED TO BE LICENSED;
(2) PAYS TO THE COMMISSIONER A NONREFUNDABLE RENEWAL FEE
OF $850; AND
(3) SUBMITS TO THE COMMISSIONER:
(I) A RENEWAL APPLICATION IN THE FORM AND IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROCESS THAT THE COMMISSIONER REQUIRES; AND

SENATE BILL 881 31
(II) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE COMMISSIONER
REASONABLY REQUIRES TO DETERMINE THAT THE RENEWAL APPLICANT
CONTINUES TO BE ELIGIBLE TO BE LICENSED.
(C) IN ADDITION TO THE LICENSE RENEWAL FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION, AN APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE RENEWAL
SHALL PAY TO NMLS THE FEE THAT NMLS IMPOSES TO PROCESS THE
APPLICATION.
14–208.
(A) (1) A LICENSEE MAY NOT ADD, DELETE, OR MODIFY A LOCATION
REQUIRED TO BE LISTED IN NMLS UNDER § 14–206 OF THIS SUBTITLE UNLESS:
(I) THE LICENSEE PROVIDES TO THE COMMISSIONER,
THROUGH NMLS AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH ANY REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE
COMMISSIONER, NOTICE OF THE ADDITION, DELETION, OR MODIFICATION;
(II) THE ADDITION, DELETION, OR MODIFICATION OF THE
LOCATION IS RECORDED WITH THE INFORMATION ASSOCIATED WITH THE
LICENSEE’S LICENSE IN NMLS; AND
(III) THE ADDITION, DELETION, OR MODIFICATION OF THE
LOCATION OTHERWISE COMPLIES WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE LICENSEE MAY NOT DO BUSINESS AT A LOCATION REQUIRED
TO BE LISTED IN NMLS UNDER § 14–206 OF THIS SUBTITLE UNTIL THE LOCATION
IS RECORDED WITH THE INFORMATION ASSOCIATED WITH THE LICENSEE’S LICENSE
IN NMLS.
(B) A LICENSEE MAY NOT UNDERGO A CHANGE IN CONTROL UNLESS THE
LICENSEE NOTIFIES THE COMMISSIONER THROUGH NMLS OF THE PROPOSED
CHANGE.
14–209.
(A) (1) A LICENSEE MAY SURRENDER A LICENSE THROUGH NMLS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROCESS THAT THE COMMISSIONER REQUIRES.
(2) WITH THE SURRENDER OF A LICENSE, A LICENSEE SHALL
PROVIDE:
(I) THE REASON FOR THE LICENSE SURRENDER; AND

SENATE BILL 881
(II) A LIST OF ALL THE LICENSEE’S OUTSTANDING
COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTIONS.
(B) THE SURRENDER OF A LICENSE DOES NOT:
(1) AFFECT ANY CIVIL OR CRIMINAL LIABILITY OF THE LICENSEE FOR
ACTS COMMITTED BEFORE THE LICENSE IS SURRENDERED; OR
(2) ENTITLE THE LICENSEE TO THE RETURN OF ANY PART OF ANY FEE
PAID TO THE COMMISSIONER.
14–210.
SUBJECT TO THE HEARING PROVISIONS OF § 14–211 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
COMMISSIONER MAY SUSPEND OR REVOKE THE LICENSE OF ANY LICENSEE IF THE
LICENSEE OR ANY OWNER, DIRECTOR, OFFICER, MEMBER, COVENTURER, PARTNER,
STOCKHOLDER, EMPLOYEE, OR AGENT OF THE LICENSEE:
(1) MAKES ANY MATERIAL MISSTATEMENT IN AN APPLICATION FOR A
LICENSE;
(2) CONDUCTS THE BUSINESS OF COMMERCIAL FINANCING IN AN
UNSAFE OR UNSOUND MANNER;
(3) REFUSES TO ALLOW THE COMMISSIONER TO MAKE AN
INVESTIGATION AUTHORIZED BY ANY LAW;
(4) WILLFULLY FAILS TO MAKE A REPORT REQUIRED UNDER ANY
LAW;
(5) IS CONVICTED UNDER THE LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES OR OF
ANY STATE OF:
(I) A FELONY; OR
(II) A MISDEMEANOR THAT IS DIRECTLY RELATED TO THE
FITNESS AND QUALIFICATION OF THE PERSON TO ENGAGE IN THE BUSINESS OF
COMMERCIAL FINANCING;
(6) IN CONNECTION WITH ANY COMMERCIAL FINANCING
TRANSACTION:
(I) COMMITS ANY FRAUD;

SENATE BILL 881 33
(II) ENGAGES IN ANY ILLEGAL OR DISHONEST ACTIVITY; OR
(III) MISREPRESENTS OR FAILS TO DISCLOSE ANY MATERIAL
FACTS TO A GOVERNMENT AGENCY OR UNIT;
(7) VIOLATES ANY PROVISION OF:
(I) THIS SUBTITLE OR ANY RULE OR REGULATION ADOPTED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 16 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW
ARTICLE OR ANY RULE OR REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 16
OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; OR
(III) ANY OTHER LAW REGULATING THE BUSINESS OF
COMMERCIAL FINANCING;
(8) BECOMES INSOLVENT;
(9) HAS SUSPENDED PAYMENT OF THE LICENSEE’S OBLIGATIONS,
MADE AN ASSIGNMENT FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE LICENSEE’S CREDITORS, OR
ADMITTED INABILITY TO PAY THE LICENSEE’S DEBTS AS THE DEBTS BECOME DUE;
OR
(10) HAS APPLIED FOR AN ADJUDICATION OF BANKRUPTCY,
REORGANIZATION, ARRANGEMENT, OR OTHER RELIEF UNDER ANY BANKRUPTCY
PROCEEDING.
14–211.
(A) BEFORE THE COMMISSIONER DENIES AN APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE
UNDER § 14–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR TAKES ANY ACTION UNDER § 14–210 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL GIVE THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE AN
OPPORTUNITY FOR A HEARING.
(B) NOTICE OF THE HEARING SHALL BE GIVEN AND THE HEARING SHALL BE
HELD IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE.
(C) FOR A HEARING ON THE PROPOSED SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF A
LICENSE, THE HEARING NOTICE TO BE GIVEN TO THE LICENSEE SHALL BE SENT BY
REGISTERED OR CERTIFIED MAIL AT LEAST 15 DAYS BEFORE THE HEARING TO THE
PLACE OF BUSINESS STATED IN THE LICENSE.

SENATE BILL 881
14–212.
THE STATE’S ATTORNEY FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE VIOLATION OCCURS
OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY PROSECUTE ANY VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
14–213.
A PERSON WHO VIOLATES ANY PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000
OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 3 YEARS OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.